Utah statutes.
4-5-15.   Consumer commodities -- Labeling and packaging.
(1)  All labels of consumer commodities, as defined by this chapter, shall
conform with the requirements for the declaration of net quantity of contents
of 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1453 and the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto:
provided, that consumer commodities exempted from 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1453(4) shall
also be exempt from this Subsection (1).
(2)  The label of any package of a consumer commodity that bears a
representation as to the number of servings of the commodity contained in the
package shall bear a statement of the net quantity in terms of weight,
measure, or numerical count for each serving.
(3) (a)  No person shall distribute or cause to be distributed in commerce any
packaged consumer commodity if any qualifying words or phrases appear in
conjunction with the separate statement of the net quantity of contents
required by Subsection (1), but nothing in this section shall prohibit
supplemental statements, at other places on the package, describing in
nondeceptive terms the net quantity of contents.
(b)  Supplemental statements of net quantity of contents may not include any
term qualifying a unit of weight, measure, or count that tends to exaggerate
the amount of the commodity contained in the package.
(4) (a)  Whenever the department determines that rules other than those
prescribed by Subsection (1) are necessary to prevent the deception of
consumers or to facilitate value comparisons as to any consumer commodity, the
department shall promulgate rules effective to:
(i)  establish and define standards for the characterization of the size of a
package enclosing any consumer commodity, which may be used to supplement the
label statement of net quantity of contents of packages containing the
commodity, but this Subsection (4) does not authorize any limitation on the
size, shape, weight, dimensions, or number of packages that may be used to
enclose any commodity;
(ii)  regulate the placement upon any package containing any commodity, or
upon any label affixed to a commodity, of any printed matter stating or
representing by implication that the commodity is offered for retail sale at a
price lower than the ordinary and customary retail sale price or that a retail
sale price advantage is accorded to purchasers by reason of the size of that
package or the quantity of its contents;
(iii)  require that the label on each package of a consumer commodity bear:
(A)  the common or usual name of such consumer commodity, if any; and
(B)  if the consumer commodity consists of two or more ingredients, the common
or usual name of each such ingredient listed in order of decreasing
predominance, but nothing in this Subsection (4) shall be considered to
require that any trade secret be divulged; or
(iv)  prevent the nonfunctional slack-fill of packages containing consumer
commodities.
(b)  For the purposes of Subsection (4)(a)(iv), a package is nonfunctionally
slack-filled if it is filled to substantially less than its capacity for
reasons other than:
(i)  protection of the contents of such package; or
(ii)  the requirements of machines used for enclosing the contents in such
package; provided, that the department may adopt any rules promulgated
according to the Fair Packaging and Labeling Act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1453.
